app/Resources/Dictionaries/hyph_fr.dic
1s2h
4sh.
4s4he.
s1he
4s4hes.
2shent.
2shm
2s3hom
s1ho
2shr
2shs
1si
1sî
1s2lav
1s2lov
s1lo
1so
1sô
1sœ
1s2patia
s1pa
spa1ti
1s2perm
s1pe
1s2phèr
s1p2h
sp1hè
1s2phér
sp1hé
1s2piel
s1pi
1s2piros
spi1ro
1s2tandard
s1ta
stan1da
1s2tein
s1te
stéréo1s2
s1té
sté1ré
1s2tigm
s1ti
1s2to1c2k
s1to
1s2tomos
sto1mo
1s2tro1p2h
s1t2r
st1ro
1s2truc1tu
st1ru
1s2ty1le
s1ty
1sû
.su2b1a2
.su3b2alt
.su2b1é2
.su3b2é3r
.su2b1in
.su1bi
.su2b3limin
.su1b2l
.sub1li
.subli1mi
.su2b3lin
.su2b3lu
sub1s2
.su2b1ur
.su1bu
supe4r1
supe1ro2
su1pe
supers2
.su2r1a2
su3r2ah
su1ra
.su3r2a3t
.su2r1e2
.su3r2eau
.su3r2ell
.su3r2et
.su2r1é2
.su2r3h
.su2r1i2m
.su1ri
.su2r1inf
.su2r1int
.su2r1of
.su1ro
.su2r1ox
1sy
1tâ
1tà
tachy1a2
ta1c2h
tac1hy
tchin3t2
t1c2h
tc1hi
1té
1tè
1tê
télé1e2
té1lé
télé1i2
télé1o2b
télé1o2p
télé1s2
4te.
4tes.
2tent.
.la3tent.
.la1te
.pa3tent.
.pa1te
compé3tent.
com1pé
compé1te
éni3tent.
é1ni
éni1te
mécon3tent.
mé1co
mécon1te
omnipo3tent.
omni1po
omnipo1te
ventripo3tent.
ven1t2r
vent1ri
ventri1po
ventripo1te
équipo3tent.
équi1po
équipo1te
impo3tent.
im1po
impo1te
mit3tent.
mit1te
.t2h4
4th.
4t4he.
t1he
4t4hes.
thermo1s2
ther1mo
2t3heur
2thl
2thm
2thn
4th4re.
th1re
4th4res.
2ths
1ti
1tî
1tô
tran2s1a2
tran3s2act
tran3s2ats
tran2s3h
tran2s1o2
tran2s1u2
4t4re.
t1re
4t4res.
2t2rent.
.tri1a2c
.t2r
.t1ri
.tri1a2n
.tri1a2t
.tri1o2n
t1t2l
1tû
tung2s3
1ty
.u4
'u4
’u4
.û4
'û4
’û4
uni1o2v
u1ni
uni1a2x
u2s3t2r
1vâ
1vé
1vè
1vê
vélo1s2ki
vé1lo
4ve.
4ves.
2vent.
conni3vent.
con1ni
conni1ve
.sou3vent.
.sou1ve
1vî
1vo
1vô
vol2t1amp
vol1ta
1v2r
4v4re.
v1re
4v4res.
2v2rent.
1vu
1vû
1vy
1we
4we.
4wes.
2went.
1wi
1wo
1wu
1w2r
2xent.
.y4
'y4
’y4
y1as1t2h
y1s2tom
ys1to
y1al1gi
1za
1ze
1zé
1zè
4ze.
4zes.
2zent.
privatdo3zent.
privatdo1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
